en: almond paste
de: Mandelmus, Mandelpaste, Mandelmasse
es: masa fina de mazapán, pasta de almendra
fi: mantelitahna
fr: pâte d'amande, pâte d'amandes, purée d'amande, purée d'amandes, beurre d'amande
hr: pasta od badema, bademova pasta
it: pasta di mandorle
ja: アーモンドペースト
pl: pasta z migdałów, pasta migdałowa
pt: Pasta de amêndoa, pasta de amêndoas
sv: mandelpasta

en: prepacked Almond paste
fr: Pâte d'amande préemballée
it: pasta di mandorle preconfezionata
sv: färdigförpackad mandelmassa

fr: amandes caramélisées
de: karamellisierte Mandeln
es: almendras caramelizadas
it: mandorle caramellate
nl: gekarameliseerde amandelen
pt: amêndoa caramelizada, amêndoas caramelizadas

fr: praliné aux amandes et aux noisettes
nl: amandelen-hazelnotenpraliné

en: almond pistachio preparation
hr: pripravak badem pistacija
it: preparazione di mandorle e pistacchi

en: brazil nut, brazil nuts
bg: бразилски орехи
cs: para ořechy
da: paranødder
de: Paranuss, Paranüsse, Paranüssen, Paranusskerne
el: καρύδια Βραζιλίας
es: nueces de Brasil, nuez de Brasil, nueces del Amazonas, coquito, coquitos
et: brasiilia pähklid, parapähklid, parapähkleid
fi: parapähkinä, parapähkinät
fr: noix du Brésil, noix d'Amazonie
ga: cnónna peagáin, cnónna Brasaíleacha
hr: brazilski orah
hu: pekándió, brazil dió
it: noci del Brasile
ja: ブラジルナッツ
lt: brazilinės bertoletijos, pekaninės karijos
lv: Brazīlijas rieksti
mt: ġewż tal-Brażil
nb: Paranøtter
nl: paranoot, paranoten
pl: orzechy brazylijskie
pt: castanha-do-Brazil, castanhas-do-Brasil, castanha do Brazil, castanhas do Brasil
ro: nuci de Brazilia
ru: бразильский орех
sk: brazílske orechy
sl: brazilski oreščki
sv: paranöt, paranötter

en: cashew nuts, cashews, cashew, cashewnut, cashew nut
ar: كاجو
bg: кашу
ca: anacards
cs: kešu ořechy
da: cashewnødder
de: Cashewkerne, Kaschunüsse, Cashewnüsse, Cashewnüssen, Cashew, Cashewnuss, cashews
el: καρύδια κάσιους
es: anacardos, nueces de anacardos, castañas de cajú
et: kašupähklid, India pähkel, kašupähkleid
fi: cashewpähkinä, cashewpähkinät, cashew
fr: noix de cajou
ga: cnónna caisiú
hr: indijski oraščići, indijski oraščić, jezgra indijskog oraha
hu: kesudió
it: noci di acagiù, anacardi
ja: カシューナッツ
lt: anakardžiai, Anakardium occidentale
lv: Indijas rieksti
mt: anakardji
nb: cashewnøtter, cashewnøtt
nl: cashewnoot, cashewnoten, cashew
pl: orzechy nerkowca, nerkowce
pt: castanhas de caju
ro: nuci Caju
ru: кешью
sk: kešu oriešky
sl: indijski oreščki
sv: cashewnötter, cashewnöt
tr: kaju
zh: 腰果

en: grilled and salted cashew nut
it: anacardi grigliati e salati

en: grilled and unsalted cashew nut
it: anacardi grigliati e non salati

en: raw cashews
de: Rohe Cashewkerne
es: cayú entero​, nuez de la India entera, anacardo entero, anacardos enteros, merey entero, cajú entero, castaña de cajú entera, castañas de cajú enteras, marañón entero, cajuil entero, caguil entero
fr: Noix de cajou crues
hr: indijski oraščić sirovi
it: anacardi crudi

en: cashew nut paste, cashew butter, cashew nut butter
de: Cashewpaste, Cashewnusspaste, Cashewmus
es: pasta de anacardos
fr: pâte de noix de cajou, purée de noix de cajou
hr: pasta od indijskih oraščića
it: pasta di anacardi

en: chestnut, chestnuts, chesnut, chesnuts
ar: كستنة؛أبو فروة
bg: кестен, кестени
ca: castanya
co: Castagna
cs: kaštan
da: Kastanje, kastanjer
de: Kastanie, Kastanien
eo: kaŝtano
es: castañas, castaña
eu: Gaztaina
fi: kastanja
fr: châtaigne, châtaignes
gl: Castaña
hr: kesten
hu: Castagna
it: castagne, castagna
ja: 栗, くり
ko: 밤
nb: kastanje
nl: kastanje, kastanjes
oc: Castanha
pl: kasztany, kasztan
pt: castanhas, castanha
ro: Castană
ru: каштан
uk: каштан

en: raw chestnut
fr: Châtaigne crue
it: castagna cruda

en: Grilled chestnut
fr: Châtaigne grillée
it: castagne grigliate

en: chestnut from the EU
it: castagna dall'UE
nl: kastanjes EU

en: chestnut powder
es: polvo de castaña
fr: poudre de châtaigne
hr: prah kestena
it: polvere di castagne
ja: くりパウダー

fr: marron, marrons
de: Maronen, Marroni
it: marroni

en: chestnut spread
fr: crème de marrons
hr: kesten namaz
it: crema di castagne
pt: créme de castanha, créme de castanhas

en: chinese chestnut
fi: kiinankastanja
hr: kineski kesten
it: castagna cinese
zh: 板栗

en: cola nut
de: Kolanuss
es: nuez de cola
fr: Noix de cola
hr: kola orah
it: noce di cola